Illinois, session 104th, HB5474.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Responsible Outdoor Lighting Control Act is 5amended by changing Sections 15, 20, and 25 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 200/15)7    Sec. 15. Outdoor lighting control. All new luminaires 8purchased with State funds after the effective date of this 9Act or installed after the effective date of this Act on a 10structure or land that is owned and managed by the Department 11of Natural Resources, including roadways, facilities, 12properties, nonhabitable structures, monuments, and public 13right-of-way spaces, including sidewalks, with the intended 14purpose of outdoor illumination must follow the following 15outdoor lighting control requirements: 16        (1) Permanent outdoor luminaires must be fully 17    shielded with an IES BUG rating and produce less than 1% of 18    its emitted light above 80 degrees from the downward 19    vertical direction of nadir. Light should not be emitted 20    at an angle above 60 degrees from the downward vertical 21    direction of nadir. 22        (2) Luminaires must avoid light trespass by not 23    exceeding an illuminance of one lux as measured at ground   HB5474 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19241 BDA 32687 b1    level both horizontally and vertically at the property 2    boundary. 3        (3) Luminaires purchased or installed on or before 4    June 30, 2032 must have a correlated color temperature 5    less than or equal to 2,700 Kelvin. All new luminaires 6    purchased or installed after June 30, 2032 must have a 7    correlated color temperature less than or equal to 2,200 8    Kelvin. In residential areas, dark sky locations, or 9    environmentally sensitive areas, such as State parks and 10    outdoor recreation facilities, correlated color 11    temperature should be no more than 2,200 Kelvin. 12        (4) Outdoor lighting must be minimized to no more than 13    25% above ANSI/IES standards or United States Department 14    of Transportation recommendations. 15        (5) Facade lighting must be minimized to no more than 16    25% above ANSI/IES standards, must project downward, and 17    must not violate the light trespass limits in paragraph 18    (2). 19        (6) When the installation or replacement of roadway 20    lighting is planned, the appropriate authority must 21    determine whether reflective roadway markings or 22    reflective signage is appropriate and safe for the 23    situation in lieu of outdoor lighting. Reflectorized 24    roadway markings, lines, warning signs, informational 25    signs or other passive means must be used for roadway 26    lighting, except at intersections of 2 or more streets or   HB5474 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19241 BDA 32687 b1    highways, unless it is determined that adequate safety 2    cannot be achieved by reflective means. 3        (7) No artificial lighting above one lux, as measured 4    at ground level both horizontally and vertically, may 5    trespass onto land or waterways designated or managed as 6    habitat, reserve, natural area, open space, or wilderness. 7(Source: P.A. 103-1007, eff. 1-1-25.) 8    (415 ILCS 200/20)9    Sec. 20. Exceptions. This Act does not apply if: 10        (1) the luminaires are on a structure or land that is 11    owned, supported, funded, leased, or managed by the State 12    in a county or municipality that, by ordinance or 13    resolution, has adopted provisions that are equal to or 14    more stringent than the provisions of this Act; 15        (2) a federal law or regulation preempts this Act; 16        (3) a State agency determines a safety or security 17    need exists that cannot be addressed by any other method; 18        (4) fire, police, rescue, or repair personnel need 19    light for temporary emergencies or road repair work; 20        (5) it has been determined that a reasonable safety 21    and security interest exists at correctional or hospital 22    facilities that cannot be addressed by another method as 23    long as it complies with existing standards, 24    specifications, or policies; 25        (6) navigational lighting systems and other lighting   HB5474 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 19241 BDA 32687 b1    are necessary to comply with Federal Aviation 2    Administration airside operations or nautical safety; 3        (7) lamps greater than 2,700 Kelvin are used on active 4    sports grounds or show grounds, but only for the duration 5    of a practice, match, or event. Lamps emitting greater 6    than 2,700 Kelvin under this paragraph must be positioned, 7    angled, or shielded to prevent direct glare and light 8    trespass onto neighboring property or properties, and the 9    positioning, angling, or shielding must limit upward light 10    emission to only the amount necessary to light the 11    sporting or grounds activity; 12        (8) flagpoles installed after the effective date of 13    this Act are lit by means of a downward-facing lamp and 14    using a lamp of 2,700 Kelvin or lower; 15        (9) flagpoles installed on or before the effective 16    date of this Act are upward-lit by partially shielded or 17    unshielded luminaires using a lamp of 2,200 Kelvin or 18    lower to minimize the impact of glare, light trespass, and 19    sky glow and are converted to conform to requirements upon 20    retrofitting; 21        (10) the luminaires luminaries are existing decorative 22    and ornamental lighting that serve historical purposes, 23    but replacement luminaires luminaries for the existing 24    decorative and ornamental lighting must meet the standards 25    of this Act to the extent possible while maintaining 26    historical fidelity; or  HB5474 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 19241 BDA 32687 b1        (11) the luminaires luminaries are temporary seasonal 2    holiday lighting lasting no longer than 45 days 3    surrounding the holiday season; or .4        (12) it is necessary to use uplighting for statuary 5    lighting and historical façade lighting. In cases where 6    uplighting is the only viable solution for these items, 7    the lighting should have a color corrected temperature of 8    no more than 2,700 degrees Kelvin, must be minimized to no 9    more than 25% above ANSI/IES standards, must not violate 10    the light trespass limits in paragraph (2) of Section 15, 11    and must be extinguished every night no later than 12:00 12    a.m. After January 1, 2027, any new placement or 13    replacement of uplighting of State historic statuary and 14    State historical façade lighting shall be approved by the 15    State Historic Preservation Office. 16(Source: P.A. 103-1007, eff. 1-1-25.) 17    (415 ILCS 200/25)18    Sec. 25. Other laws. If this Act conflicts with any other 19federal law, State law, or local ordinance controlling 20lighting, outdoor luminaires luminaries, signage, outdoor 21advertising, displays, or devices that is more stringent than 22the Act, then the federal law, State law, or local ordinance 23controls to the extent it is more stringent than the Act.24(Source: P.A. 103-1007, eff. 1-1-25.)